North Carolina, session 2025, SB252.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Pinetops to support the staffing needs of the Town's fire department.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S252-v-1*